South Dakota, session 2026, HB1170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-26-67 be AMENDED:
34-26-67. (a) The Department of Public Safety shall establish or contract for the
establishment of a donor registry.
(b) The department, in partnership with the federally-designated organ
procurement organization and any nonprofit tissue or eye donation agency which that
holds agreements with hospitals in South Dakota, shall compile, operate, maintain, and
modify the registry as necessary. The registry shall must include pertinent information on
all South Dakotans who have registered to donate organs, tissues, and eyes, and all
relevant information regarding a donor's making amendment to, or revocation of, an
anatomical gift in accordance with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act ( §§ 34-26-48
to 34-26-72, inclusive).
(c) A donor registry must:
(1) Allow a donor, or other person authorized under by § 34-26-51, to include on the
donor registry a statement or symbol that the donor has made, amended, or
revoked an anatomical gift;
(2) Allow a donor or an individual, or other person authorized by § 34-26-51, online
access to register:
(A) Register as a donor, to amend an;
(B) Amend the individual's existing donor status, or remove an;
(C) Remove the individual's existing donor registration seven days a
week on a twenty-four hour basis; and
(D) Verify the individual's donor registration status;
(3) Be accessible electronically to the federally designated organ procurement
organization and any nonprofit tissue or eye donation agency which that holds
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.91.11 2 1170
agreements with hospitals in South Dakota to allow the procurement organization
to obtain relevant information on the donor registry to determine, at or near death
of the donor or a prospective donor, whether the donor or prospective donor has
made, amended, or revoked an anatomical gift; and
(4) Be accessible for purposes of subdivision (2) seven days a week on a twenty-four
hour basis.
(d) Personally identifiable information on a donor registry about a donor or
prospective donor may not be used or disclosed without the express consent of the donor,
prospective donor, or person that made the anatomical gift for any purpose other than to
determine, at or near death of the donor or prospective donor, whether the donor or
prospective donor has made, amended, or revoked an anatomical gift.
(e) This section does not prohibit any person from creating or maintaining a donor
registry that is not established by or under contract with the state. Any such registry must
comply with subsections (c) and (d).
(f) The department shall collect data from the registry that is not restricted by
subsection (d) and share the data with the federally-designated organ procurement
organization and any nonprofit tissue or eye donation agency which that holds agreements
with hospitals in South Dakota to be used for the purpose of evaluating the effectiveness
or educational initiatives to promote organ, tissue, and eye donation that are conducted
or coordinated by organ procurement organizations, hospitals, and state agencies
operating in the state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.